Nebraska, session 109, LB587.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB587 LB587
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-1425, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1425 (1) Except as provided in the Uniform Residential Landlord
and Tenant Act, if there is a material noncompliance by the landlord with
the rental agreement or a noncompliance with section 76-1419 materially
affecting health and safety, the tenant may deliver a written notice to
the landlord specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach
and that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than
fourteen thirty days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not
remedied in seven fourteen days, and the rental agreement shall terminate
as provided in the notice subject to the following. If the breach is
remediable by repairs or the payment of damages or otherwise and the
landlord adequately remedies the breach prior to the date specified in
the notice, the rental agreement will not terminate. If substantially the
same act or omission which constituted a prior noncompliance of which
notice was given recurs within six months, the tenant may terminate the
rental agreement upon at least seven fourteen days' written notice
specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental
agreement. The tenant may not terminate for a condition caused by the
deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of his or
her family, or other person on the premises with his or her consent.
(2) Except as provided in the Uniform Residential Landlord and
Tenant Act, the tenant may recover damages and obtain injunctive relief
for any noncompliance by the landlord with the rental agreement or
section 76-1419. If the landlord's noncompliance is willful the tenant
may recover reasonable attorney's fees. If the landlord's noncompliance
is caused by conditions or circumstances beyond his or her control, the
tenant may not recover consequential damages, but retains remedies
provided in section 76-1427.
(3) The remedy provided in subsection (2) of this section is in
addition to any right of the tenant arising under subsection (1) of this
-2-

LB587 LB587
2025 2025
section.
(4) If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return
all prepaid rent and security recoverable by the tenant under section
76-1416.
Sec. 2. Section 76-1427, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1427 (1) If, contrary to the rental agreement or section 76-1419,
the landlord deliberately or negligently fails to supply running water,
hot water, or heat, or essential services, or if the landlord fails to
remediate a known mold problem or pest infestation, the tenant may give
written notice to the landlord specifying the breach and may:
(a) Procure reasonable amounts of hot water, running water, heat and
essential services during the period of the landlord's noncompliance and
deduct their actual and reasonable cost from the rent;
(b) Purchase supplies or services to remediate such mold problem or
pest infestation during the period of the landlord's noncompliance and
deduct their actual and reasonable costs from the rent;
(c) (b) Recover damages based upon the diminution in the fair rental
value of the dwelling unit; and or
(d) Recover damages based on diminution in value of the tenant's
personal property as a result of deliberate or negligent noncompliance or
conduct by the landlord.
(2) The (c) Procure reasonable substitute housing during the period
of the landlord's noncompliance, in which case the tenant is excused from
paying rent for the period of the landlord's noncompliance.
(3) In addition to the remedies remedy provided in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section subdivisions (a) and (c), if the landlord's
failure to supply is deliberate, the tenant may recover the actual and
reasonable cost or fair and reasonable value of the substitute housing.
not in excess of an amount equal to the periodic rent, and in
(4) In any case brought under this section, the tenant may recover
-3-

LB587 LB587
2025 2025
subsection reasonable attorney's fees.
(2) If the tenant proceeds under this section, he may not proceed
under section 76-1425 as to that breach.
(5) (3) The rights under this section do not arise until the tenant
has given written notice to the landlord or if the condition was caused
by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of
the tenant's his family, or other person on the premises with the
tenant's his consent. This section is not intended to cover circumstances
beyond the landlord's control.
Sec. 3. Original sections 76-1425 and 76-1427, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-